Indiana, session 2026, SB187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-107.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 107.3. "Indebtedness", for
purposes of IC 13-26-10-0.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 13-26-10-0.5(a).
SECTION 2. IC 13-26-1-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) At any time after
the creation of a district, the district, after motion by the district's board
after first notifying in writing the district authority established
under IC 13-26-11-15, may file a petition with the department
requesting the approval of the department permitting the district to:
(1) increase or add to the district's purposes or modify the district
plan approved by the department;
(2) abandon or surrender all or part of a purpose or plan approved
by the department; or
(3) subject to IC 13-26-4-1, increase the number of persons
serving on the board of trustees.
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153


(b) The department may:
(1) approve;
(2) modify and approve; or
(3) reject;
a request received under this section.
SECTION 3. IC 13-26-4-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Instead of
electing the board, an order establishing a district may provide for
appointments to the board by the elected executive or legislative
officers of the eligible entities having territory in the district.
(b) An appointed trustee under this chapter serves at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
SECTION 4. IC 13-26-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.232-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. After first notifying in writing the district
authority established under IC 13-26-11-15, a district may do the
following:
(1) Sue or be sued.
(2) Make contracts in the exercise of the rights, powers, and
duties conferred upon the district.
(3) Adopt and alter a seal and use the seal by causing the seal to
be impressed, affixed, reproduced, or otherwise used. However,
the failure to affix a seal does not affect the validity of an
instrument.
(4) Adopt, amend, and repeal the following:
(A) Bylaws for the administration of the district's affairs.
(B) Rules and regulations for the following:
(i) The control of the administration and operation of the
district's service and facilities.
(ii) The exercise of all of the district's rights of ownership.
(5) Construct, acquire, lease, operate, or manage works and obtain
rights, easements, licenses, money, contracts, accounts, liens,
books, records, maps, or other property, whether real, personal, or
mixed, of a person or an eligible entity.
(6) Assume in whole or in part any liability or obligation of:
(A) a person;
(B) a nonprofit water, sewage, or solid waste project system;
or
(C) an eligible entity;
including a pledge of part or all of the net revenues of a works to
the debt service on outstanding bonds of an entity in whole or in
part in the district and including a right on the part of the district
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153


to indemnify and protect a contracting party from loss or liability
by reason of the failure of the district to perform an agreement
assumed by the district or to act or discharge an obligation.
(7) Fix, alter, charge, and collect reasonable rates and other
charges in the area served by the district's facilities to every
person whose premises are, whether directly or indirectly,
supplied with water or provided with sewage or solid waste
services by the facilities for the purpose of providing for the
following:
(A) The payment of the expenses of the district.
(B) The construction, acquisition, improvement, extension,
repair, maintenance, and operation of the district's facilities
and properties.
(C) The payment of principal or interest on the district's
obligations.
(D) To fulfill the terms of agreements made with:
(i) the purchasers or holders of any obligations; or
(ii) a person or an eligible entity.
(8) Except as provided in sections 2.5 and 2.6 of this chapter,
require connection to the district's sewer system of property
producing sewage or similar waste, and require the
discontinuance of use of privies, cesspools, septic tanks, and
similar structures if:
(A) there is an available sanitary sewer within three hundred
(300) feet of:
(i) the property line, if the property is adjacent to a body of
water, including a lake, river, or reservoir;
(ii) any part of a subdivision, or land that is divided or
proposed to be divided into lots, whether contiguous or
subject to zoning requirements, for the purpose of sale or
lease as part of a larger common plan of development or
sale; or
(iii) for all other properties, the improvement or other
structure from which the sewage or similar waste is
discharged;
(B) the district has given written notice by certified mail to the
property owner at the address of the property at least ninety
(90) days before a date for connection to be stated in the notice
and the notice includes a list of the applicable exemptions
from connecting to the sewer system available to the property
owner that are described in section 2.5 of this chapter; and
(C) if the property is located outside the district's territory:
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153


(i) the district has obtained and provided to the property
owner (along with the notice required by clause (B)) a letter
of recommendation from the local health department that
there is a possible threat to the public's health; and
(ii) if the property is also located within the extraterritorial
jurisdiction of a municipal sewage works under IC 36-9-23
or a public sanitation department under IC 36-9-25, the
municipal works board or department of public sanitation
has acknowledged in writing that the property is within the
municipal sewage works or department of public sanitation's
extraterritorial jurisdiction, but the municipal works board
or department of public sanitation is unable to provide sewer
service.
However, a district may not require the owner of a property
described in this subdivision to connect to the district's sewer
system if the property is already connected to a sewer system that
has received an NPDES permit and has been determined to be
functioning satisfactorily.
(9) Provide by ordinance for a reasonable penalty, not to exceed
one hundred dollars ($100) per day, for failure to connect and also
apply to the circuit or superior court of the county in which the
property is located for an order to force connection, with the cost
of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees of the district,
to be assessed by the court against the property owner in the
action.
(10) Refuse the services of the district's facilities if the rates or
other charges are not paid by the user.
(11) Control and supervise all property, works, easements,
licenses, money, contracts, accounts, liens, books, records, maps,
or other property rights and interests conveyed, delivered,
transferred, or assigned to the district.
(12) Construct, acquire by purchase or otherwise, operate, lease,
preserve, and maintain works considered necessary to accomplish
the purposes of the district's establishment within or outside the
district and enter into contracts for the operation of works owned,
leased, or held by another entity, whether public or private.
(13) Hold, encumber, control, acquire by donation, purchase, or
condemnation, construct, own, lease as lessee or lessor, use, and
sell interests in real and personal property or franchises within or
outside the district for:
(A) the location or protection of works;
(B) the relocation of buildings, structures, and improvements
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153


situated on land required by the district or for any other
necessary purpose; or
(C) obtaining or storing material to be used in constructing and
maintaining the works.
(14) Upon consent of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the
board, merge or combine with another district into a single district
on terms so that the surviving district:
(A) is possessed of all rights, franchises, and authority of the
constituent districts; and
(B) is subject to all the liabilities, obligations, and duties of
each of the constituent districts, with all rights of creditors of
the constituent districts being preserved unimpaired.
(15) Provide by agreement with another eligible entity for the
joint construction of works the district is authorized to construct
if the construction is for the district's own benefit and that of the
other entity. For this purpose the cooperating entities may jointly
appropriate land either within or outside their respective borders
if all subsequent proceedings, actions, powers, liabilities, rights,
and duties are those set forth by statute.
(16) Enter into contracts with a person, an eligible entity, the
state, or the United States to provide services to the contracting
party for any of the following:
(A) The distribution or purification of water.
(B) The collection or treatment of sanitary sewage.
(C) The collection, disposal, or recovery of solid waste.
(17) Make provision for, contract for, or sell the district's
byproducts or waste.
(18) Exercise the power of eminent domain, including for
purposes of siting sewer or water utility infrastructure, but only
after the district attempts to use existing public rights-of-way or
easements.
(19) Remove or change the location of a fence, building, railroad,
canal, or other structure or improvement located within or outside
the district. If:
(A) it is not feasible or economical to move the building,
structure, or improvement situated in or upon land acquired;
and
(B) the cost is determined by the board to be less than that of
purchase or condemnation;
the district may acquire land and construct, acquire, or install
buildings, structures, or improvements similar in purpose to be
exchanged for the buildings, structures, or improvements under
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153


contracts entered into between the owner and the district.
(20) Employ consulting engineers, superintendents, managers,
and other engineering, construction, and accounting experts,
attorneys, bond counsel, employees, and agents that are necessary
for the accomplishment of the district's purpose and fix their
compensation.
(21) Procure insurance against loss to the district by reason of
damages to the district's properties, works, or improvements
resulting from fire, theft, accident, or other casualty or because of
the liability of the district for damages to persons or property
occurring in the operations of the district's works and
improvements or the conduct of the district's activities.
(22) Exercise the powers of the district without obtaining the
consent of other eligible entities. However, the district shall:
(A) restore or repair all public or private property damaged in
carrying out the powers of the district and place the property
in the property's original condition as nearly as practicable; or
(B) pay adequate compensation for the property.
(23) Dispose of, by public or private sale or lease, real or personal
property determined by the board to be no longer necessary or
needed for the operation or purposes of the district.
SECTION 5. IC 13-26-10-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) As used in this section,
"indebtedness" includes leases, contracts, bonds, and public
private partnership obligations.
(b) A district created after June 30, 2026, may not incur any
indebtedness under this chapter without first obtaining the
approval of the county fiscal body in which the district is located
before the district may incur the indebtedness.
(c) If a district created after June 30, 2026, contains territory in
more than one (1) county, the district may not incur any
indebtedness under this chapter without first obtaining the
approval of the county fiscal body of each county in which the
district contains territory before the district may incur the
indebtedness.
(d) A county fiscal body must approve or deny the district's
request to incur indebtedness under subsection (b) or (c)
(whichever applies) not later than sixty (60) days after the date the
district makes a request to the county fiscal body to incur the
indebtedness.
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Environmental Affairs, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 187, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 6, line 18, after "district" insert "created after June 30,
2026,".
Page 6, line 21, after "district" insert "created after June 30,
2026,".
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy.
(Reference is to SB 187 as introduced.)
NIEMEYER, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 6, Nays 2.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 187, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-107.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 107.3. "Indebtedness", for
purposes of IC 13-26-10-0.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 13-26-10-0.5(a).".
Page 1, line 4, delete "and in consultation with" and insert "after
first notifying in writing".
Page 2, line 10, delete "In consultation with" and insert "After first
notifying in writing".
Page 6, delete lines 16 through 33, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 5. IC 13-26-10-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) As used in this section,
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153


"indebtedness" includes leases, contracts, bonds, and public
private partnership obligations.
(b) A district created after June 30, 2026, may not incur any
indebtedness under this chapter without first obtaining the
approval of the county fiscal body in which the district is located
before the district may incur the indebtedness.
(c) If a district created after June 30, 2026, contains territory in
more than one (1) county, the district may not incur any
indebtedness under this chapter without first obtaining the
approval of the county fiscal body of each county in which the
district contains territory before the district may incur the
indebtedness.
(d) A county fiscal body must approve or deny the district's
request to incur indebtedness under subsection (b) or (c)
(whichever applies) not later than sixty (60) days after the date the
district makes a request to the county fiscal body to incur the
indebtedness.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 187 as printed January 14, 2026.)
HOLDMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0.
SB 187—LS 6801/DI 153